Louisiana, session 2026, HB865.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:1069.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1069.2. Hospital service districts; consent agreements; notice
For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Affiliate" means a person, trust, or form of legal entity or legal
association, whether operated for-profit or not-for-profit that is all of the following:
(a) Connected to another entity through ownership, control, or a shared
relationship as evidenced by any of the following:
(i) If an entity directly or indirectly, through its governing board members
or executive officers, owns five percent or more of any class of ownership or
membership interest of the other person, trust, or form of legal entity or legal
association, whether voting or non-voting.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-676 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 865
(ii) If an entity has "control" over the affiliate. Control shall be deemed to
exist when one entity, directly or indirectly, is controlled by or is under common
control with another entity. Control can be established through ownership of voting
interests, contractual relationships, financial relationships, coordinated operations,
or other means.
(iii) If an entity has a shared relationship with the affiliate. A shared
relationship means any relationship or connection between entities that creates a
meaningful association or influence, even absent ownership or control. Without
limiting the generality of the foregoing, and by way of illustration and not limitation,
a shared relationship includes entities such as subsidiaries, parent entities, sister
companies, executive officers, members, or directors; shared resources and facilities;
support of a mutual mission or common goals; shared assets; financial relationships
as creditor and borrower or landlord and tenant; collaborative arrangements
including but not limited to any agreement provided for in accordance with R.S.
46:1077; a history of acting in concert or corroboration; contractual relationships that
create mutual obligations and benefits; management and service agreements between
the entities; shared leadership; familial relationships amongst any of the foregoing;
and any other relationship or evidence of any form of significant influence by one
entity over another entity's operations or decision-making processes. The mere
existence of a contractual relationship between an entity and hospital service district
does not establish a shared relationship.
(b) Created by or caused to be created by a parish governing authority,
hospital service district, the governmental authority that created the hospital service
district, or commissioner or officer of a hospital service district.
(2) "Healthcare facility" means any facility that provides medical, wellness,
health, or clinical care to individuals including but not limited to all of the following:
(a) A hospital inpatient or outpatient department, emergency room, or
satellite facility.
(b) An ambulatory surgical center.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-676 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 865
(c) An urgent care clinic.
(d) A diagnostic imaging or testing center.
(e) A psychiatric hospital or distinct part unit.
(f) A rehabilitation hospital or distinct part unit.
(g) A skilled nursing facility, physical therapy clinic, infusion therapy clinic,
or end-stage renal disease facility.
(h) A medical office building.
(i) A wellness center.
(j) A primary care, specialty care, or multi-specialty clinic.
(k) A clinical laboratory.
(l) A rural health clinic.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.